Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 25 Computer Trespass

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 73, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§
40-25-101.
Computer trespass.

A person commits a civil trespass if he, with intent to damage or cause the malfunction of the operation of a computer, computer system or computer network, transfers or sends electronically into a computer, computer system or computer network of another or causes to be transferred or sent electronically into a computer, computer system or computer network of another any data, program or other information which alters, damages or causes the malfunction of the operation of the computer, computer system or computer network and the act was done without authority of the owner or lawful possessor of the computer, computer system or computer network.

A person who suffers damage or loss by reason of a trespass under this section shall have a cause of action against the trespasser for all damages incurred, including any damages to the person’s computer, computer system or computer network and any costs incurred by the person for services that could not be utilized as a result of the trespass. In a civil action brought under this section, in addition to damages, the injured claimant may be awarded the costs of litigation together with the reasonably necessary cost of identifying the trespasser, of obtaining effective service of process on the trespasser and of successfully effecting collection of the award from the person who perpetrated the trespass and from the person who caused the trespass.

The definitions provided in W.S.

6-3-501

shall be applicable to this section.

Common carriers, internet service providers or other persons who supply the internet services over which the content is delivered shall not be liable for damages or losses under this section resulting from the acts of another.

History:

2014 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.